Illinois, session 104th, HB4709.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Standardized Prior Authorization Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to regulate 7prior authorization by: 8        (1) protecting the health care professional-patient 9    relationship from unreasonable third-party interference; 10        (2) preventing prior authorization programs from 11    hindering the independent medical judgment of a physician 12    or other health care provider; and13        (3) ensuring the transparency of a fair and consistent 14    process for health care providers and their patients. 15    Section 10. Applicability and scope. This Act applies to 16health insurance coverage as defined in the Illinois Health 17Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, and policies 18issued or delivered in this State to the Department of 19Healthcare and Family Services and providing coverage to 20persons who are enrolled under Article V of the Illinois 21Public Aid Code or under the Children's Health Insurance 22Program Act, amended, delivered, issued, or renewed on or   HB4709- 2 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1after the effective date of this Act, except employee or 2employer self-insured health benefit plans under the federal 3Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 or health care 4provided pursuant to the Workers' Compensation Act or the 5Workers' Occupational Diseases Act. This Act does not diminish 6a health care plan's duties and responsibilities under other 7federal or State law or rules adopted pursuant to those laws. 8This Act is not intended to alter or impede the provisions of 9any consent decree or judicial order to which the State or any 10of its agencies is a party. 11    Section 15. Definitions. In this Act, unless the context 12requires otherwise:13    "Adverse determination" means a determination by a health 14insurance issuer that, based on the information provided, a 15pre-service request for a benefit under the health insurance 16issuer's health benefit plan upon application of any 17utilization review technique does not meet the health 18insurance issuer's requirements for medical necessity, 19appropriateness, health care setting, level of care, or 20effectiveness or is determined to be experimental or 21investigational and the requested benefit is therefore denied.22    "Appeal" means a formal request, either orally or in 23writing, to reconsider an adverse determination.24    "Approval" means a determination by a health insurance 25issuer that a health care service has been reviewed and, based   HB4709- 3 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1on the information provided, satisfies the health insurance 2issuer's requirements for medical necessity and 3appropriateness.4    "Clinical review criteria" means the written screening 5procedures, decision abstracts, clinical protocols, and 6practice guidelines used by a health insurance issuer to 7determine the necessity and appropriateness of health care 8services.9    "Department" means the Department of Insurance.10    "Emergency medical condition" means a medical condition 11manifesting itself through acute symptoms of sufficient 12severity, including, but not limited to, severe pain, such 13that a prudent layperson who possesses an average knowledge of 14health and medicine could reasonably expect the absence of 15immediate medical attention to result in:16        (1) placing the health of the individual or, with 17    respect to a pregnant woman, the health of the woman or her 18    unborn child in serious jeopardy;19        (2) serious impairment to bodily functions; or20        (3) serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.21    "Emergency services" means health care items and services 22furnished or required to evaluate and treat an emergency 23medical condition.24    "Enrollee" means any person and the person's dependents 25enrolled in or covered by a health care plan.26    "Expedited prior authorization request" means a request   HB4709- 4 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1for prior authorization of a health care service when, in the 2opinion of a treating health care professional or health care 3provider with knowledge of the enrollee's medical condition, 4nonexpedited prior authorization:5        (1) could seriously jeopardize the life or health of 6    the enrollee or the ability of the enrollee to regain 7    maximum function;8        (2) could subject the enrollee to severe pain that 9    cannot be adequately managed without the care or treatment 10    that is the subject of the utilization review; or11        (3) could lead to a likely onset of an emergency 12    medical condition if the service is not rendered during 13    the time period to render a prior authorization 14    determination for an urgent medical service.15    "Expedited prior authorization request" does not include 16emergency services.17    "Health care professional" means a physician licensed to 18practice medicine under the Medical Practice Act of 1987, a 19nurse licensed under the Nurse Practice Act, a physician 20assistant licensed under the Physician Assistant Practice Act 21of 1987, or any other individual that is licensed or otherwise 22authorized to deliver health care services.23    "Health care provider" means any physician, hospital, 24ambulatory surgical treatment center, or other person or 25facility that is licensed or otherwise authorized to deliver 26health care services.  HB4709- 5 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    "Health care service" means any service or level of 2service included in the furnishing to an individual of medical 3care or the hospitalization incident to the furnishing of such 4care, as well as the furnishing to any person of any other 5services for the purpose of preventing, diagnosing, screening 6for, alleviating, curing, or healing human illness or injury, 7including behavioral health, mental health, home health and 8pharmaceutical services, products, and medications.9    "Health insurance issuer" has the meaning given to that 10term in Section 5 of the Illinois Health Insurance Portability 11and Accountability Act.12    "Medically necessary" means when a health care 13professional exercising prudent clinical judgment would 14provide care to a patient for the purpose of preventing, 15diagnosing, or treating an illness, injury, or a disease or 16its symptoms that are:17        (1) in accordance with generally accepted standards of 18    medical practice; and19        (2) clinically appropriate in terms of type, 20    frequency, extent, site, and duration and are considered 21    effective for the patient's illness, injury, or disease; 22    and not primarily for the convenience of the patient, 23    treating physician, other health care professional, 24    caregiver, family member, or other interested party, and 25    focused on what is best for the patient's health outcome.26    "NCPDP SCRIPT Standard" means the National Council for   HB4709- 6 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1Prescription Drug Programs SCRIPT Standard Version 2017071 or 2the most recent Standard adopted by the United States 3Department of Health and Human Services. "NCPDP SCRIPT 4Standard" includes subsequently released versions of the NCPDP 5SCRIPT Standard.6    "Physician" means any person licensed by the State of 7Illinois to practice medicine in all its branches. "Physician" 8includes any person holding a temporary license, as provided 9in the Medical Practice Act of 1987.10    "Prior authorization" means the process by which a health 11insurance issuer determines the medical necessity and medical 12appropriateness of an otherwise covered health care service 13before rendering the health care service. "Prior 14authorization" includes any notification required of an 15enrollee, health care professional, or health care provider by 16the health insurance issuer before, at the time of, or 17concurrent with providing a health care service, regardless of 18whether explicit approval is requested by the health insurance 19issuer.20    "Private review agent" means a third-party entity hired by 21a health insurance issuer to perform utilization review.22    "Utilization review" means to assess the medical 23necessity, appropriateness, and cost-effectiveness of health 24care services for prior authorization, concurrent review, or 25retrospective auditing.   HB4709- 7 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    Section 20. Disclosure and review of prior authorization 2requirements. 3    (a) A health insurance issuer shall maintain a complete 4list of services for which prior authorization is required, 5including for all services where prior authorization is 6performed by an entity under contract with the health 7insurance issuer.8    (b) A health insurance issuer shall make any current prior 9authorization requirements and restrictions, including written 10clinical review criteria, readily accessible and conspicuously 11posted on its website or online portals to enrollees, health 12care professionals, and health care providers. Content 13published by a third party and licensed for use by a health 14insurance issuer may be made available through the health 15insurance issuer's secure, password-protected website or 16online portals, so long as the access requirements of the 17website do not unreasonably restrict access. Requirements 18shall be described in detail, written in easily understandable 19language, and readily available to the health care 20professional and health care provider at the point of care. 21The website shall indicate for each service subject to prior 22authorization:23        (1) when prior authorization became required for 24    policies issued or health benefit plan documents delivered 25    in Illinois, including the effective date or dates and the 26    termination date or dates, if applicable, in Illinois;  HB4709- 8 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1        (2) the date the Illinois-specific requirement was 2    listed on the health insurance issuer's, health benefit 3    plan's, or private review agent's website; and4        (3) when applicable, access to a standardized 5    electronic prior authorization request transaction 6    process.7    (c) The clinical review criteria must:8        (1) be consistent with nationally accepted standards 9    generally recognized by physicians and health care 10    providers practicing in relevant medical and clinical 11    specialties except where state law provides its own 12    standard;13        (2) be developed in accordance with the current 14    standards of a national medical accreditation entity;15        (3) ensure quality of care and access to needed health 16    care services;17        (4) use evidence based on sources, such as 18    peer-reviewed scientific studies;19        (5) be sufficiently flexible to allow deviations from 20    norms when justified on a case-by-case basis; and21        (6) be evaluated and updated, if necessary, at least 22    annually.23    (d) A health insurance issuer shall not deny a claim for 24failure to obtain prior authorization if the prior 25authorization requirement was not in effect on the date of 26service on the claim or if prior authorization requirements   HB4709- 9 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1were not publicly disclosed by the plan on the health 2insurance issuer's website or other materials.3    (e) A health insurance issuer shall not deem as incidental 4or deny supplies or health care services that are routinely 5used as part of a health care service when:6        (1) an associated health care service has received 7    prior authorization; or8        (2) prior authorization for the health care service is 9    not required.10    (f) If a health insurance issuer intends either to 11implement a new prior authorization requirement or restriction 12or amend an existing requirement or restriction, the health 13insurance issuer shall provide impacted enrollees, contracted 14health care professionals, and contracted health care 15providers of enrollees written notice of the new or amended 16requirement or amendment no less than 60 days before the 17requirement or restriction is implemented. Written notice may 18take the form of a conspicuous notice posted on the health 19insurance issuer's public website or portal for contracted 20health care professionals and contracted health care 21providers, or email notice to health care professionals or 22providers. A health insurance issuer shall provide email 23notices to all impacted enrollees and to health care 24professionals or health care providers if the health care 25professional or health care provider has requested to receive 26the notice through email. A new or amended requirement shall   HB4709- 10 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1not be implemented unless the health insurance issuer's 2website has been updated to reflect the new or amended 3requirement or restriction. Written notice of a new, amended, 4or restricted prior authorization requirement, as required by 5this subsection (f), may be provided less than 60 days in 6advance if a health insurance issuer determines and 7contemporaneously notifies the Department in writing that:8        (1) the health insurance issuer has identified 9    fraudulent or abusive practices related to the health care 10    service;11        (2) the health care service is unavailable or scarce, 12    which necessitates the use of an alternative health care 13    service;14        (3) the health care service is newly introduced to the 15    health care market, and a delay in providing coverage for 16    the health care service would not be in the best interest 17    of enrollees;18        (4) the health care service is the subject of a 19    clinical trial authorized by the United States Food and 20    Drug Administration;21        (5) changes to the health care service or its 22    availability are otherwise required by law to be made by 23    the health insurance issuer in less than 60 days; or24        (6) the prior authorization requirement is being 25    removed.26    (g) Health insurance issuers using prior authorization   HB4709- 11 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1shall make statistics available regarding prior authorization 2approvals and denials on the health insurance issuer's website 3in a readily accessible format. Following each calendar year, 4the statistics must be updated annually by June 1 and include 5all of the following information:6        (1) a list of all health care services, including 7    medications, that are subject to prior authorization;8        (2) the percentage of standard prior authorization 9    requests that were approved, aggregated for all items and 10    services;11        (3) the percentage of standard prior authorization 12    requests that were denied, aggregated for all items and 13    services;14        (4) the percentage of prior authorization requests 15    that were approved, aggregated for all items and services;16        (5) the percentage of prior authorization requests for 17    which the time frame for review was extended, and the 18    request was approved, aggregated for all items and 19    services;20        (6) the percentage of expedited prior authorization 21    requests that were approved, aggregated for all items and 22    services;23        (7) the percentage of expedited authorization requests 24    that were denied, aggregated for all items and services;25        (8) the average and median time that elapsed between 26    the submission of a request and a determination by the   HB4709- 12 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    payer, plan, or health insurance issuer for standard prior 2    authorization, aggregated for all items and services; and3        (9) the average and median time that elapsed between 4    the submission of a request and a decision by the payer, 5    plan, or health insurance issuer for expedited prior 6    authorization, aggregated for all times and services. 7    (h) In the case of a prior authorization request for a 8clinical laboratory test, a health insurance issuer must 9accept a prior authorization request prior to the date of 10specimen collection or at any time between the date of 11specimen collection and the date on which a timely claim for 12reimbursement is submitted to the health insurance issuer.13    (i) A health insurance issuer may request from a provider 14or supplier only medical or other documentation that is 15reasonably necessary to evaluate a prior authorization 16request. 17    Section 25. Standardized electronic prior authorization 18request transaction process.19    (a) On and after January 1, 2028, and until December 31, 202028, if any health insurance issuer requires prior 21authorization of a health care service, the health insurance 22issuer's or its designee's utilization review organization 23shall make available a standardized electronic prior 24authorization request transaction process using an Internet 25webpage, Internet webpage portal, or similar Internet-based   HB4709- 13 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1system. On and after January 1, 2029, a health insurance 2issuer must accept and respond to prior authorization requests 3under the pharmacy benefit through a secure electronic 4transmission using NCPDP SCRIPT Standard ePA transactions.5    (b) On and after January 1, 2029, all health care 6professionals and health care providers shall be required to 7use the standardized electronic prior authorization request 8transaction process made available as required by subsection 9(a). 10    Section 30. Standard prior authorizations. 11    (a) As used in this Section, "necessary information" 12includes the results of any face-to-face clinical evaluation, 13second opinion, or other clinical information that is directly 14applicable to the requested service that may be required. 15    (b) If a health insurance issuer requires prior 16authorization of a health care service, the health insurance 17issuer must make an approval or adverse determination and 18notify the enrollee and the enrollee's health care 19professional or provider of the approval or adverse 20determination as expeditiously as the enrollee's condition 21requires but no later than 5 calendar days after obtaining all 22necessary information to make the approval or adverse 23determination, unless a longer minimum time frame is required 24under federal law for the health insurance issuer and the 25health care service at issue.   HB4709- 14 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 2health insurance issuers must comply with the requirements of 3the Illinois Insurance Code that apply to prior authorization 4requirements for pharmaceutical services. 5    Section 35. Expedited prior authorizations.6    (a) If requested by a treating health care provider or 7health care professional for an enrollee, a health insurance 8issuer must render an approval or adverse determination 9concerning urgent health care services and notify the enrollee 10and the enrollee's health care professional or provider of 11that approval or adverse determination as expeditiously as the 12enrollee's condition requires but no later than 24 hours after 13receiving all information needed to complete the review of the 14requested health care services, unless a longer minimum time 15frame is required under federal law for the health insurance 16issuer and the urgent health care service at issue.17    (b) To facilitate the rendering of a prior authorization 18determination in conformance with this Section, a health 19insurance issuer must establish a mechanism to ensure health 20care professionals have access to appropriately trained and 21licensed physicians of the same specialty for consultation who 22are designated by the plan to make such determinations for 23prior authorization concerning urgent care services. 24    Section 40. Notifications of adverse determinations;   HB4709- 15 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1appeals. If a health insurance issuer makes an adverse 2determination, the health insurance issuer shall include the 3following in the notification to the enrollee and the 4enrollee's health care professional or health care provider:5        (1) the reasons for the adverse determination and 6    related evidence-based criteria, including a description 7    of any missing or insufficient documentation;8        (2) the right to appeal the adverse determination;9        (3) instructions on how to file the appeal; and10        (4) additional documentation necessary to support the 11    appeal. 12    Section 45. Personnel qualified to review appeals. A 13health insurance issuer must ensure that all appeals are 14reviewed by a physician when the request is by a physician or a 15representative of a physician. The physician must:16        (1) possess a current and valid unrestricted license 17    to practice medicine with substantially similar licensing 18    requirements to this State;19        (2) be certified by the boards of the American Board 20    of Medical Specialties or the American Board of Osteopathy 21    within the relevant specialty of a physician who typically 22    manages the medical condition or disease;23        (3) have training, knowledge, or experience of 24    providing the health care services under appeal; 25        (4) not have been directly involved in making the   HB4709- 16 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    adverse determination; and2        (5) consider all known clinical aspects of the health 3    care service under review, including a review of all 4    pertinent medical records provided to the health insurance 5    issuer by the enrollee's health care professional or 6    health care provider, the health plan's clinical 7    guidelines, as well as peer-reviewed scientific studies. 8    Section 50. Health insurance issuer review of prior 9authorization requirements. A health insurance issuer shall 10periodically review its prior authorization requirements and 11consider removal of prior authorization requirements. 12    Section 55. Revocation of prior authorizations.13    (a) A health insurance issuer may not revoke or further 14limit, condition, or restrict a previously issued prior 15authorization approval while it remains valid under this Act 16unless:17        (1) the health insurance issuer has identified 18    fraudulent or abusive practices related to the health care 19    service;20        (2) the health care service is unavailable, which 21    necessitates the use of an alternative health care 22    service;23        (3) the health care service is the subject of a new 24    safety alert from the United States Food and Drug   HB4709- 17 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    Administration or is in response to a public health 2    emergency;3        (4) the change is based on nationally recognized, 4    generally accepted standards developed in accordance with 5    current standards of a national medical accreditation 6    entity or specialty society; or7        (5) changes to the health care service or its 8    availability are otherwise required by law to be made by 9    the health insurance issuer in less than 60 days.10    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a claim 11is properly coded and submitted timely to a health insurance 12issuer, the health insurance issuer shall make payment 13according to the terms of coverage on claims for health care 14services for which prior authorization was required and 15approval received before the rendering of health care 16services, unless one of the following occurs:17        (1) it is determined that the enrollee's health care 18    professional or health care provider knowingly and without 19    exercising prudent clinical judgment provided health care 20    services that required prior authorization from the health 21    insurance issuer or its contracted private review agent 22    without first obtaining prior authorization for those 23    health care services;24        (2) it is timely determined that the health care 25    services claimed were not performed;26        (3) it is timely determined that the health care   HB4709- 18 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    services rendered were contrary to the instructions of the 2    health insurance issuer or its contracted private review 3    agent or delegated reviewer if contact was made between 4    those parties before the service being rendered;5        (4) it is timely determined that the enrollee 6    receiving such health care services was not an enrollee of 7    the health care plan; or8        (5) the approval was based upon a material 9    misrepresentation by the enrollee, health care 10    professional, or health care provider; as used in this 11    paragraph, "material" means a fact or situation that would 12    have resulted in a substantial change in the determination 13    had it accurately been disclosed in the submission.14    (c) Nothing in this Section shall preclude a private 15review agent or a health insurance issuer from performing 16post-service reviews of health care claims for purposes of 17payment integrity or for the prevention of fraud, waste, or 18abuse. 19    Section 60. Length of approvals.20    (a) A prior authorization approval shall be valid for the 21lesser of 12 months after the date the health care 22professional or health care provider receives the prior 23authorization approval or the length of the treatment as 24determined by the patient's health care professional. However, 25a health insurance issuer and an enrollee or the enrollee's   HB4709- 19 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1health care professional may extend a prior authorization 2approval for a longer period, by agreement. All dosage 3increases must be based on established evidentiary standards, 4and nothing in this Section shall prohibit a health insurance 5issuer from having safety edits in place. This Section shall 6not apply to the prescription of benzodiazepines or Schedule 7II narcotic drugs, such as opioids.8    (b) Nothing in this Section shall require a policy or plan 9to cover any care, treatment, or services for any health 10condition that the terms of coverage otherwise completely 11exclude from the policy's or plan's covered benefits without 12regard for whether the care, treatment, or services are 13medically necessary. 14    Section 65. Approvals for chronic conditions.15    (a) If a health insurance issuer requires a prior 16authorization for a recurring health care service or 17maintenance medication for the treatment of a chronic or 18long-term condition, including, but not limited to, 19chemotherapy for the treatment of cancer, the approval shall 20remain valid for the lesser of 12 months from the date the 21health care professional or health care provider receives the 22prior authorization approval or the length of the treatment as 23determined by the patient's health care professional. However, 24a health insurance issuer and an enrollee or the enrollee's 25health care professional may extend a prior authorization   HB4709- 20 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1approval for a longer period, by agreement. This Section shall 2not apply to the prescription of benzodiazepines or Schedule 3II narcotic drugs, such as opioids.4    (b) Nothing in this Section shall require a policy or plan 5to cover any care, treatment, or services for any health 6condition that the terms of the coverage otherwise completely 7exclude from the policy's or plan's covered benefits without 8regard for whether the care, treatment, or services are 9medically necessary. 10    Section 70. Continuity of prior approvals.11    (a) On receipt of information documenting a prior 12authorization approval from the enrollee or from the 13enrollee's health care professional or health care provider, a 14health insurance issuer shall honor a prior authorization 15granted to an enrollee from a previous health insurance issuer 16for at least the initial 90 days of an enrollee's coverage 17under a new health plan, subject to the terms of the member's 18coverage agreement.19    (b) During the time period described in subsection (a), a 20health insurance issuer may perform its own review to grant a 21prior authorization approval subject to the terms of the 22member's coverage agreement.23    (c) If there is a change in coverage of or approval 24criteria for a previously authorized health care service, the 25change in coverage or approval criteria does not affect an   HB4709- 21 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1enrollee who received prior authorization approval before the 2effective date of the change for the remainder of the 3enrollee's plan year.4    (d) Except to the extent required by medical exceptions 5processes for prescription drugs, nothing in this Section 6shall require a policy or plan to cover any care, treatment, or 7services for any health condition that the terms of coverage 8otherwise completely exclude from the policy's or plan's 9covered benefits without regard for whether the care, 10treatment, or services are medically necessary. 11    Section 75. Effect of health insurance issuer's failure to 12comply. A failure by a health insurance issuer to comply with 13the deadlines and other requirements specified in this Act 14shall result in any health care services subject to review to 15be automatically deemed authorized by the health insurance 16issuer or its contracted private review agent. 17    Section 80. Enforcement and administration.18    (a) In addition to the enforcement powers granted to it by 19law to enforce the provisions of this Act, the Department is 20granted specific authority to issue a cease and desist order 21or require a private review agent or health insurance issuer 22to submit a plan of correction for violations of this Act, or 23both. Subject to rules adopted by the Department under the 24provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, and   HB4709- 22 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1after proper notice and opportunity for a hearing, the 2Department may impose upon a private review agent, health 3benefit plan, or health insurance issuer an administrative 4fine not to exceed $2,000 per violation for failure to submit a 5requested plan of correction, failure to comply with its plan 6of correction, or repeated violations of this Act. All fines 7collected by the Department under this Section shall be 8deposited into the General Revenue Fund.9    (b) Any person or the person's treating physician who has 10evidence that the person's health insurance issuer or health 11benefit plan is in violation of the provisions of this Act may 12file a complaint with the Department. The Department shall 13review all complaints received and investigate all complaints 14that it deems to state a potential violation. The Department 15shall fairly, efficiently, and timely review and investigate 16complaints. Health insurance issuers, health benefit plans, 17and private review agents found to be in violation of this Act 18shall be penalized in accordance with this Section.19    (c) Nothing in this Act may be construed to create a 20private right of action. 21    Section 85. Reports to the Department.22    (a) By June 1, 2028 and each June 1 thereafter, a health 23insurance issuer shall report to the Department, on a form 24issued by the Department, the following aggregated trend data, 25de-identified of protected health information, related to the   HB4709- 23 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1health insurance issuer's practices and experience for the 2prior plan year for health care services submitted for 3payment:4        (1) the number of prior authorization requests;5        (2) the percentage of prior authorization requests 6    denied;7        (3) the percentage of prior authorization appeals 8    received;9        (4) the percentage of adverse determinations reversed 10    on appeal;11        (5) the percentage of prior authorization requests 12    that were not submitted electronically;13        (6) as a percentage of service, the 10 health care 14    services that were most frequently denied through prior 15    authorization; and16        (7) the 5 reasons prior authorization requests were 17    most frequently denied.18    (b) All reports required by this Section shall be 19considered public records, and the Department shall make the 20reports freely available upon request and post all reports to 21its public website without redactions. 22    Section 90. False requests for prior authorization. If a 23health insurance issuer has clear and convincing evidence that 24a health care professional or health care provider has 25knowingly and willfully submitted false or fraudulent requests   HB4709- 24 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1for prior authorization to the health insurance issuer, the 2issuer shall notify and provide that information to the 3Department of Insurance. After receiving such information, the 4Department of Insurance shall forward these reports to the 5Department of Financial and Professional Regulation and the 6Illinois Attorney General. 7    Section 95. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 8necessary to implement and administer this Act. 9    Section 900. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 10changing Sections 356z.66 and 370c as follows: 11    (215 ILCS 5/356z.66)12    Sec. 356z.66. Proton beam therapy.13    (a) As used in this Section:14    "Medically necessary" has the meaning given to that term 15in the Standardized Prior Authorization Act Prior 16Authorization Reform Act. 17    "Proton beam therapy" means a type of radiation therapy 18treatment that utilizes protons as the radiation delivery 19method for the treatment of tumors and cancerous cells.20    "Radiation therapy treatment" means the delivery of 21biological effective doses with proton therapy, intensity 22modulated radiation therapy, brachytherapy, stereotactic body 23radiation therapy, three-dimensional conformal radiation   HB4709- 25 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1therapy, or other forms of therapy using radiation. 2    (b) A group or individual policy of accident and health 3insurance or managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 4issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025 that provides 5coverage for the treatment of cancer shall not apply a higher 6standard of clinical evidence for the coverage of proton beam 7therapy than the insurer applies for the coverage of any other 8form of radiation therapy treatment. 9    (c) A group or individual policy of accident and health 10insurance or managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 11issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025 that provides 12coverage or benefits to any resident of this State for 13radiation oncology shall include coverage or benefits for 14medically necessary proton beam therapy for the treatment of 15cancer. 16(Source: P.A. 103-325, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 17    (215 ILCS 5/370c)  (from Ch. 73, par. 982c)18    Sec. 370c. Mental and emotional disorders. 19    (a)(1) On and after January 1, 2022 (the effective date of 20Public Act 102-579), every insurer that amends, delivers, 21issues, or renews group accident and health policies providing 22coverage for hospital or medical treatment or services for 23illness shall provide coverage for the medically necessary 24treatment of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 25disorders or conditions consistent with the parity   HB4709- 26 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1requirements of Section 370c.1 of this Code.2    (2) Each insured that is covered for mental, emotional, 3nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions shall be 4free to select the physician licensed to practice medicine in 5all its branches, licensed clinical psychologist, licensed 6clinical social worker, licensed clinical professional 7counselor, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed 8speech-language pathologist, or other licensed or certified 9professional at a program licensed pursuant to the Substance 10Use Disorder Act of his or her choice to treat such disorders, 11and the insurer shall pay the covered charges of such 12physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches, 13licensed clinical psychologist, licensed clinical social 14worker, licensed clinical professional counselor, licensed 15marriage and family therapist, licensed speech-language 16pathologist, or other licensed or certified professional at a 17program licensed pursuant to the Substance Use Disorder Act up 18to the limits of coverage, provided (i) the disorder or 19condition treated is covered by the policy, and (ii) the 20physician, licensed psychologist, licensed clinical social 21worker, licensed clinical professional counselor, licensed 22marriage and family therapist, licensed speech-language 23pathologist, or other licensed or certified professional at a 24program licensed pursuant to the Substance Use Disorder Act is 25authorized to provide said services under the statutes of this 26State and in accordance with accepted principles of his or her   HB4709- 27 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1profession.2    (3) Insofar as this Section applies solely to licensed 3clinical social workers, licensed clinical professional 4counselors, licensed marriage and family therapists, licensed 5speech-language pathologists, and other licensed or certified 6professionals at programs licensed pursuant to the Substance 7Use Disorder Act, those persons who may provide services to 8individuals shall do so after the licensed clinical social 9worker, licensed clinical professional counselor, licensed 10marriage and family therapist, licensed speech-language 11pathologist, or other licensed or certified professional at a 12program licensed pursuant to the Substance Use Disorder Act 13has informed the patient of the desirability of the patient 14conferring with the patient's primary care physician.15    (4) "Mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorder 16or condition" means a condition or disorder that involves a 17mental health condition or substance use disorder that falls 18under any of the diagnostic categories listed in the mental 19and behavioral disorders chapter of the current edition of the 20World Health Organization's International Classification of 21Disease or that is listed in the most recent version of the 22American Psychiatric Association's Diagnostic and Statistical 23Manual of Mental Disorders. "Mental, emotional, nervous, or 24substance use disorder or condition" includes any mental 25health condition that occurs during pregnancy or during the 26postpartum period and includes, but is not limited to,   HB4709- 28 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1postpartum depression.2    (5) Medically necessary treatment and medical necessity 3determinations shall be interpreted and made in a manner that 4is consistent with and pursuant to subsections (h) through 5(y). 6    (b)(1) (Blank).7    (2) (Blank).8    (2.5) (Blank). 9    (3) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law and 10consistent with the parity requirements of Section 370c.1 of 11this Code, the insurer that amends, delivers, issues, or 12renews a group or individual policy of accident and health 13insurance, a qualified health plan offered through the health 14insurance marketplace, or a provider of treatment of mental, 15emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions 16shall furnish medical records or other necessary data that 17substantiate that initial or continued treatment is at all 18times medically necessary. Nothing in this paragraph (3) 19supersedes the prohibition on prior authorization requirements 20to the extent provided under subsections (g) and (w) and 21subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6.5) of this subsection. 22Nothing prevents the insured from agreeing in writing to 23continue treatment at his or her expense. When making a 24determination of the medical necessity for a treatment 25modality for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 26disorders or conditions, an insurer must make the   HB4709- 29 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1determination in a manner that is consistent with the manner 2used to make that determination with respect to other diseases 3or illnesses covered under the policy, including an appeals 4process. Medical necessity determinations for substance use 5disorders shall be made in accordance with appropriate patient 6placement criteria established by the American Society of 7Addiction Medicine. No additional criteria may be used to make 8medical necessity determinations for substance use disorders. 9    (4) A group health benefit plan amended, delivered, 10issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2019 (the effective 11date of Public Act 100-1024) or an individual policy of 12accident and health insurance or a qualified health plan 13offered through the health insurance marketplace amended, 14delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2019 (the 15effective date of Public Act 100-1024):16        (A) shall provide coverage based upon medical 17    necessity for the treatment of a mental, emotional, 18    nervous, or substance use disorder or condition consistent 19    with the parity requirements of Section 370c.1 of this 20    Code; provided, however, that in each calendar year 21    coverage shall not be less than the following:22            (i) 45 days of inpatient treatment; and23            (ii) beginning on June 26, 2006 (the effective 24        date of Public Act 94-921), 60 visits for outpatient 25        treatment including group and individual outpatient 26        treatment; and  HB4709- 30 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1            (iii) for plans or policies delivered, issued for 2        delivery, renewed, or modified after January 1, 2007 3        (the effective date of Public Act 94-906), 20 4        additional outpatient visits for speech therapy for 5        treatment of pervasive developmental disorders that 6        will be in addition to speech therapy provided 7        pursuant to item (ii) of this subparagraph (A); and8        (B) may not include a lifetime limit on the number of 9    days of inpatient treatment or the number of outpatient 10    visits covered under the plan.11        (C) (Blank).12    (5) An issuer of a group health benefit plan or an 13individual policy of accident and health insurance or a 14qualified health plan offered through the health insurance 15marketplace may not count toward the number of outpatient 16visits required to be covered under this Section an outpatient 17visit for the purpose of medication management and shall cover 18the outpatient visits under the same terms and conditions as 19it covers outpatient visits for the treatment of physical 20illness.21    (5.5) An individual or group health benefit plan amended, 22delivered, issued, or renewed on or after September 9, 2015 23(the effective date of Public Act 99-480) shall offer coverage 24for medically necessary acute treatment services and medically 25necessary clinical stabilization services. The treating 26provider shall base all treatment recommendations and the   HB4709- 31 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1health benefit plan shall base all medical necessity 2determinations for substance use disorders in accordance with 3the most current edition of the Treatment Criteria for 4Addictive, Substance-Related, and Co-Occurring Conditions 5established by the American Society of Addiction Medicine. The 6treating provider shall base all treatment recommendations and 7the health benefit plan shall base all medical necessity 8determinations for medication-assisted treatment in accordance 9with the most current Treatment Criteria for Addictive, 10Substance-Related, and Co-Occurring Conditions established by 11the American Society of Addiction Medicine.12    As used in this subsection:13    "Acute treatment services" means 24-hour medically 14supervised addiction treatment that provides evaluation and 15withdrawal management and may include biopsychosocial 16assessment, individual and group counseling, psychoeducational 17groups, and discharge planning.18    "Clinical stabilization services" means 24-hour treatment, 19usually following acute treatment services for substance 20abuse, which may include intensive education and counseling 21regarding the nature of addiction and its consequences, 22relapse prevention, outreach to families and significant 23others, and aftercare planning for individuals beginning to 24engage in recovery from addiction. 25    "Prior authorization" has the meaning given to that term 26in the Standardized Prior Authorization Act Section 15 of the   HB4709- 32 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1Prior Authorization Reform Act. 2    (6) An issuer of a group health benefit plan may provide or 3offer coverage required under this Section through a managed 4care plan.5    (6.5) An individual or group health benefit plan amended, 6delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2019 (the 7effective date of Public Act 100-1024):8        (A) shall not impose prior authorization requirements, 9    including limitations on dosage, other than those 10    established under the Treatment Criteria for Addictive, 11    Substance-Related, and Co-Occurring Conditions 12    established by the American Society of Addiction Medicine, 13    on a prescription medication approved by the United States 14    Food and Drug Administration that is prescribed or 15    administered for the treatment of substance use disorders;16        (B) shall not impose any step therapy requirements;17        (C) shall place all prescription medications approved 18    by the United States Food and Drug Administration 19    prescribed or administered for the treatment of substance 20    use disorders on, for brand medications, the lowest tier 21    of the drug formulary developed and maintained by the 22    individual or group health benefit plan that covers brand 23    medications and, for generic medications, the lowest tier 24    of the drug formulary developed and maintained by the 25    individual or group health benefit plan that covers 26    generic medications; and  HB4709- 33 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1        (D) shall not exclude coverage for a prescription 2    medication approved by the United States Food and Drug 3    Administration for the treatment of substance use 4    disorders and any associated counseling or wraparound 5    services on the grounds that such medications and services 6    were court ordered.7    (7) (Blank).8    (8) (Blank).9    (9) With respect to all mental, emotional, nervous, or 10substance use disorders or conditions, coverage for inpatient 11treatment shall include coverage for treatment in a 12residential treatment center certified or licensed by the 13Department of Public Health or the Department of Human 14Services. 15    (c) This Section shall not be interpreted to require 16coverage for speech therapy or other habilitative services for 17those individuals covered under Section 356z.15 of this Code. 18    (d) With respect to a group or individual policy of 19accident and health insurance or a qualified health plan 20offered through the health insurance marketplace, the 21Department and, with respect to medical assistance, the 22Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall each 23enforce the requirements of this Section and Sections 356z.23 24and 370c.1 of this Code, the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici 25Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, 42 26U.S.C. 18031(j), and any amendments to, and federal guidance   HB4709- 34 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1or regulations issued under, those Acts, including, but not 2limited to, final regulations issued under the Paul Wellstone 3and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity 4Act of 2008 and final regulations applying the Paul Wellstone 5and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity 6Act of 2008 to Medicaid managed care organizations, the 7Children's Health Insurance Program, and alternative benefit 8plans. Specifically, the Department and the Department of 9Healthcare and Family Services shall take action:10        (1) proactively ensuring compliance by individual and 11    group policies, including by requiring that insurers 12    submit comparative analyses, as set forth in paragraph (6) 13    of subsection (k) of Section 370c.1, demonstrating how 14    they design and apply nonquantitative treatment 15    limitations, both as written and in operation, for mental, 16    emotional, nervous, or substance use disorder or condition 17    benefits as compared to how they design and apply 18    nonquantitative treatment limitations, as written and in 19    operation, for medical and surgical benefits;20        (2) evaluating all consumer or provider complaints 21    regarding mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 22    disorder or condition coverage for possible parity 23    violations;24        (3) performing parity compliance market conduct 25    examinations or, in the case of the Department of 26    Healthcare and Family Services, parity compliance audits   HB4709- 35 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    of individual and group plans and policies, including, but 2    not limited to, reviews of:3            (A) nonquantitative treatment limitations, 4        including, but not limited to, prior authorization 5        requirements, concurrent review, retrospective review, 6        step therapy, network admission standards, 7        reimbursement rates, and geographic restrictions;8            (B) denials of authorization, payment, and 9        coverage; and10            (C) other specific criteria as may be determined 11        by the Department.12    The findings and the conclusions of the parity compliance 13market conduct examinations and audits shall be made public.14    The Director may adopt rules to effectuate any provisions 15of the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity 16and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 that relate to the business of 17insurance.18    (e) Availability of plan information. 19        (1) The criteria for medical necessity determinations 20    made under a group health plan, an individual policy of 21    accident and health insurance, or a qualified health plan 22    offered through the health insurance marketplace with 23    respect to mental health or substance use disorder 24    benefits (or health insurance coverage offered in 25    connection with the plan with respect to such benefits) 26    must be made available by the plan administrator (or the   HB4709- 36 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    health insurance issuer offering such coverage) to any 2    current or potential participant, beneficiary, or 3    contracting provider upon request. 4        (2) The reason for any denial under a group health 5    benefit plan, an individual policy of accident and health 6    insurance, or a qualified health plan offered through the 7    health insurance marketplace (or health insurance coverage 8    offered in connection with such plan or policy) of 9    reimbursement or payment for services with respect to 10    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 11    conditions benefits in the case of any participant or 12    beneficiary must be made available within a reasonable 13    time and in a reasonable manner and in readily 14    understandable language by the plan administrator (or the 15    health insurance issuer offering such coverage) to the 16    participant or beneficiary upon request. 17    (f) As used in this Section, "group policy of accident and 18health insurance" and "group health benefit plan" includes (1) 19State-regulated employer-sponsored group health insurance 20plans written in Illinois or which purport to provide coverage 21for a resident of this State; and (2) State, county, 22municipal, or school district employee health plans. 23References to an insurer include all plans described in this 24subsection. 25    (g) (1) As used in this subsection:26    "Benefits", with respect to insurers that are not Medicaid   HB4709- 37 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1managed care organizations, means the benefits provided for 2treatment services for inpatient and outpatient treatment of 3substance use disorders or conditions at American Society of 4Addiction Medicine levels of treatment 2.1 (Intensive 5Outpatient), 2.5 (High-Intensity Outpatient), 3.1 (Clinically 6Managed Low-Intensity Residential), 3.5 (Clinically Managed 7High-Intensity Residential), and 3.7 (Medically Managed 8Residential) and OMT (Opioid Maintenance Therapy) services.9    "Benefits", with respect to Medicaid managed care 10organizations, means the benefits provided for treatment 11services for inpatient and outpatient treatment of substance 12use disorders or conditions at American Society of Addiction 13Medicine levels of treatment 2.1 (Intensive Outpatient), 2.5 14(High-Intensity Outpatient), 3.5 (Clinically Managed 15High-Intensity Residential), and 3.7 (Medically Managed 16Residential) and OMT (Opioid Maintenance Therapy) services. 17    "Substance use disorder treatment provider or facility" 18means a licensed physician, licensed psychologist, licensed 19psychiatrist, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, or 20licensed, certified, or otherwise State-approved facility or 21provider of substance use disorder treatment.22    (2) A group health insurance policy, an individual health 23benefit plan, or qualified health plan that is offered through 24the health insurance marketplace, small employer group health 25plan, and large employer group health plan that is amended, 26delivered, issued, executed, or renewed in this State, or   HB4709- 38 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1approved for issuance or renewal in this State, on or after 2January 1, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 100-1023) 3shall comply with the requirements of this Section and Section 4370c.1. The services for the treatment and the ongoing 5assessment of the patient's progress in treatment shall follow 6the requirements of 77 Ill. Adm. Code 2060.7    (3) Prior authorization shall not be utilized for the 8benefits under this subsection. Except to the extent 9prohibited by Section 370c.1 with respect to treatment 10limitations in a benefit classification or subclassification, 11the insurer may require the substance use disorder treatment 12provider or facility to notify the insurer of the initiation 13of treatment. For an insurer that is not a Medicaid managed 14care organization, the substance use disorder treatment 15provider or facility may be required to give notification for 16the initiation of treatment of the covered person within 2 17business days. For Medicaid managed care organizations, the 18substance use disorder treatment provider or facility may be 19required to give notification in accordance with the protocol 20set forth in the provider agreement for initiation of 21treatment within 24 hours. If the Medicaid managed care 22organization is not capable of accepting the notification in 23accordance with the contractual protocol during the 24-hour 24period following admission, the substance use disorder 25treatment provider or facility shall have one additional 26business day to provide the notification to the appropriate   HB4709- 39 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1managed care organization. Treatment plans shall be developed 2in accordance with the requirements and timeframes established 3in 77 Ill. Adm. Code 2060. No such coverage shall be subject to 4concurrent review prior to the applicable notification 5deadline. If coverage is denied retrospectively, neither the 6provider or facility nor the insurer shall bill, and the 7covered individual shall not be liable, for any treatment 8under this subsection through the date the adverse 9determination is issued, other than any copayment, 10coinsurance, or deductible for the treatment or stay through 11that date as applicable under the policy. Coverage shall not 12be retrospectively denied for benefits that were furnished at 13a participating substance use disorder facility prior to the 14applicable notification deadline except for the following:15        (A) upon reasonable determination that the benefits 16    were not provided;17        (B) upon determination that the patient receiving the 18    treatment was not an insured, enrollee, or beneficiary 19    under the policy;20        (C) upon material misrepresentation by the patient or 21    provider. As used in this subparagraph (C), "material" 22    means a fact or situation that is not merely technical in 23    nature and results or could result in a substantial change 24    in the situation;25        (D) upon determination that a service was excluded 26    under the terms of coverage. For situations that qualify   HB4709- 40 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    under this subparagraph (D), the limitation to billing for 2    a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible shall not apply;3        (E) upon determination that a service was not 4    medically necessary consistent with subsections (h) 5    through (n); or6        (F) upon determination that the patient did not 7    consent to the treatment and that there was no court order 8    mandating the treatment. 9    (4) For an insurer that is not a Medicaid managed care 10organization, if an insurer determines that benefits are no 11longer medically necessary, the insurer shall notify the 12covered person, the covered person's authorized 13representative, if any, and the covered person's health care 14provider in writing of the covered person's right to request 15an external review pursuant to the Health Carrier External 16Review Act. The notification shall occur within 24 hours 17following the adverse determination.18    Pursuant to the requirements of the Health Carrier 19External Review Act, the covered person or the covered 20person's authorized representative may request an expedited 21external review. An expedited external review may not occur if 22the substance use disorder treatment provider or facility 23determines that continued treatment is no longer medically 24necessary. 25    If an expedited external review request meets the criteria 26of the Health Carrier External Review Act, an independent   HB4709- 41 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1review organization shall make a final determination of 2medical necessity within 72 hours. If an independent review 3organization upholds an adverse determination, an insurer 4shall remain responsible to provide coverage of benefits 5through the day following the determination of the independent 6review organization. A decision to reverse an adverse 7determination shall comply with the Health Carrier External 8Review Act.9    (5) The substance use disorder treatment provider or 10facility shall provide the insurer with 7 business days' 11advance notice of the planned discharge of the patient from 12the substance use disorder treatment provider or facility and 13notice on the day that the patient is discharged from the 14substance use disorder treatment provider or facility.15    (6) The benefits required by this subsection shall be 16provided to all covered persons with a diagnosis of substance 17use disorder or conditions. The presence of additional related 18or unrelated diagnoses shall not be a basis to reduce or deny 19the benefits required by this subsection.20    (7) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 21require an insurer to provide coverage for any of the benefits 22in this subsection.23    (8) Any concurrent or retrospective review permitted by 24this subsection must be consistent with the utilization review 25provisions in subsections (h) through (n). 26    (h) As used in this Section:  HB4709- 42 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    "Generally accepted standards of mental, emotional, 2nervous, or substance use disorder or condition care" means 3standards of care and clinical practice that are generally 4recognized by health care providers practicing in relevant 5clinical specialties such as psychiatry, psychology, clinical 6sociology, social work, addiction medicine and counseling, and 7behavioral health treatment. Valid, evidence-based sources 8reflecting generally accepted standards of mental, emotional, 9nervous, or substance use disorder or condition care include 10peer-reviewed scientific studies and medical literature, 11recommendations of nonprofit health care provider professional 12associations and specialty societies, including, but not 13limited to, patient placement criteria and clinical practice 14guidelines, recommendations of federal government agencies, 15and drug labeling approved by the United States Food and Drug 16Administration.17    "Medically necessary treatment of mental, emotional, 18nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions" means a 19service or product addressing the specific needs of that 20patient, for the purpose of screening, preventing, diagnosing, 21managing, or treating an illness, injury, or condition or its 22symptoms and comorbidities, including minimizing the 23progression of an illness, injury, or condition or its 24symptoms and comorbidities in a manner that is all of the 25following:26        (1) in accordance with the generally accepted   HB4709- 43 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    standards of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 2    disorder or condition care;3        (2) clinically appropriate in terms of type, 4    frequency, extent, site, and duration; and5        (3) not primarily for the economic benefit of the 6    insurer, purchaser, or for the convenience of the patient, 7    treating physician, or other health care provider.8    "Utilization review" means either of the following:9        (1) prospectively, retrospectively, or concurrently 10    reviewing and approving, modifying, delaying, or denying, 11    based in whole or in part on medical necessity, requests 12    by health care providers, insureds, or their authorized 13    representatives for coverage of health care services 14    before, retrospectively, or concurrently with the 15    provision of health care services to insureds.16        (2) evaluating the medical necessity, appropriateness, 17    level of care, service intensity, efficacy, or efficiency 18    of health care services, benefits, procedures, or 19    settings, under any circumstances, to determine whether a 20    health care service or benefit subject to a medical 21    necessity coverage requirement in an insurance policy is 22    covered as medically necessary for an insured.23    "Utilization review criteria" means patient placement 24criteria or any criteria, standards, protocols, or guidelines 25used by an insurer to conduct utilization review.26    (i)(1) Every insurer that amends, delivers, issues, or   HB4709- 44 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1renews a group or individual policy of accident and health 2insurance or a qualified health plan offered through the 3health insurance marketplace in this State and Medicaid 4managed care organizations providing coverage for hospital or 5medical treatment on or after January 1, 2023 shall, pursuant 6to subsections (h) through (s), provide coverage for medically 7necessary treatment of mental, emotional, nervous, or 8substance use disorders or conditions.9    (2) An insurer shall not set a specific limit on the 10duration of benefits or coverage of medically necessary 11treatment of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 12disorders or conditions or limit coverage only to alleviation 13of the insured's current symptoms.14    (3) All utilization review conducted by the insurer 15concerning diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of insureds 16diagnosed with mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 17disorders or conditions shall be conducted in accordance with 18the requirements of subsections (k) through (w).19    (4) An insurer that authorizes a specific type of 20treatment by a provider pursuant to this Section shall not 21rescind or modify the authorization after that provider 22renders the health care service in good faith and pursuant to 23this authorization for any reason, including, but not limited 24to, the insurer's subsequent cancellation or modification of 25the insured's or policyholder's contract, or the insured's or 26policyholder's eligibility. Nothing in this Section shall   HB4709- 45 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1require the insurer to cover a treatment when the 2authorization was granted based on a material 3misrepresentation by the insured, the policyholder, or the 4provider. Nothing in this Section shall require Medicaid 5managed care organizations to pay for services if the 6individual was not eligible for Medicaid at the time the 7service was rendered. Nothing in this Section shall require an 8insurer to pay for services if the individual was not the 9insurer's enrollee at the time services were rendered. As used 10in this paragraph, "material" means a fact or situation that 11is not merely technical in nature and results in or could 12result in a substantial change in the situation.13    (j) An insurer shall not limit benefits or coverage for 14medically necessary services on the basis that those services 15should be or could be covered by a public entitlement program, 16including, but not limited to, special education or an 17individualized education program, Medicaid, Medicare, 18Supplemental Security Income, or Social Security Disability 19Insurance, and shall not include or enforce a contract term 20that excludes otherwise covered benefits on the basis that 21those services should be or could be covered by a public 22entitlement program. Nothing in this subsection shall be 23construed to require an insurer to cover benefits that have 24been authorized and provided for a covered person by a public 25entitlement program. Medicaid managed care organizations are 26not subject to this subsection.  HB4709- 46 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    (k) An insurer shall base any medical necessity 2determination or the utilization review criteria that the 3insurer, and any entity acting on the insurer's behalf, 4applies to determine the medical necessity of health care 5services and benefits for the diagnosis, prevention, and 6treatment of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 7disorders or conditions on current generally accepted 8standards of mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 9disorder or condition care. All denials and appeals shall be 10reviewed by a professional with experience or expertise 11comparable to the provider requesting the authorization.12    (l) In conducting utilization review of all covered health 13care services for the diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of 14mental, emotional, and nervous disorders or conditions, an 15insurer shall apply the criteria and guidelines set forth in 16the most recent version of the treatment criteria developed by 17an unaffiliated nonprofit professional association for the 18relevant clinical specialty or, for Medicaid managed care 19organizations, criteria and guidelines determined by the 20Department of Healthcare and Family Services that are 21consistent with generally accepted standards of mental, 22emotional, nervous or substance use disorder or condition 23care. Pursuant to subsection (b), in conducting utilization 24review of all covered services and benefits for the diagnosis, 25prevention, and treatment of substance use disorders an 26insurer shall use the most recent edition of the patient   HB4709- 47 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1placement criteria established by the American Society of 2Addiction Medicine.3    (m) In conducting utilization review relating to level of 4care placement, continued stay, transfer, discharge, or any 5other patient care decisions that are within the scope of the 6sources specified in subsection (l), an insurer shall not 7apply different, additional, conflicting, or more restrictive 8utilization review criteria than the criteria set forth in 9those sources. For all level of care placement decisions, the 10insurer shall authorize placement at the level of care 11consistent with the assessment of the insured using the 12relevant patient placement criteria as specified in subsection 13(l). If that level of placement is not available, the insurer 14shall authorize the next higher level of care. In the event of 15disagreement, the insurer shall provide full detail of its 16assessment using the relevant criteria as specified in 17subsection (l) to the provider of the service and the patient.18    If an insurer purchases or licenses utilization review 19criteria pursuant to this subsection, the insurer shall verify 20and document before use that the criteria were developed in 21accordance with subsection (k). 22    (n) In conducting utilization review that is outside the 23scope of the criteria as specified in subsection (l) or 24relates to the advancements in technology or in the types or 25levels of care that are not addressed in the most recent 26versions of the sources specified in subsection (l), an   HB4709- 48 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1insurer shall conduct utilization review in accordance with 2subsection (k).3    (o) This Section does not in any way limit the rights of a 4patient under the Medical Patient Rights Act.5    (p) This Section does not in any way limit early and 6periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment benefits as 7defined under 42 U.S.C. 1396d(r).8    (q) To ensure the proper use of the criteria described in 9subsection (l), every insurer shall do all of the following:10        (1) Educate the insurer's staff, including any third 11    parties contracted with the insurer to review claims, 12    conduct utilization reviews, or make medical necessity 13    determinations about the utilization review criteria.14        (2) Make the educational program available to other 15    stakeholders, including the insurer's participating or 16    contracted providers and potential participants, 17    beneficiaries, or covered lives. The education program 18    must be provided at least once a year, in-person or 19    digitally, or recordings of the education program must be 20    made available to the aforementioned stakeholders.21        (3) Provide, at no cost, the utilization review 22    criteria and any training material or resources to 23    providers and insured patients upon request. For 24    utilization review criteria not concerning level of care 25    placement, continued stay, transfer, discharge, or other 26    patient care decisions used by the insurer pursuant to   HB4709- 49 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    subsection (m), the insurer may place the criteria on a 2    secure, password-protected website so long as the access 3    requirements of the website do not unreasonably restrict 4    access to insureds or their providers. No restrictions 5    shall be placed upon the insured's or treating provider's 6    access right to utilization review criteria obtained under 7    this paragraph at any point in time, including before an 8    initial request for authorization.9        (4) Track, identify, and analyze how the utilization 10    review criteria are used to certify care, deny care, and 11    support the appeals process.12        (5) Conduct interrater reliability testing to ensure 13    consistency in utilization review decision making that 14    covers how medical necessity decisions are made; this 15    assessment shall cover all aspects of utilization review 16    as defined in subsection (h).17        (6) Run interrater reliability reports about how the 18    clinical guidelines are used in conjunction with the 19    utilization review process and parity compliance 20    activities.21        (7) Achieve interrater reliability pass rates of at 22    least 90% and, if this threshold is not met, immediately 23    provide for the remediation of poor interrater reliability 24    and interrater reliability testing for all new staff 25    before they can conduct utilization review without 26    supervision.  HB4709- 50 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1        (8) Maintain documentation of interrater reliability 2    testing and the remediation actions taken for those with 3    pass rates lower than 90% and submit to the Department of 4    Insurance or, in the case of Medicaid managed care 5    organizations, the Department of Healthcare and Family 6    Services the testing results and a summary of remedial 7    actions as part of parity compliance reporting set forth 8    in subsection (k) of Section 370c.1.9    (r) This Section applies to all health care services and 10benefits for the diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of 11mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 12conditions covered by an insurance policy, including 13prescription drugs.14    (s) This Section applies to an insurer that amends, 15delivers, issues, or renews a group or individual policy of 16accident and health insurance or a qualified health plan 17offered through the health insurance marketplace in this State 18providing coverage for hospital or medical treatment and 19conducts utilization review as defined in this Section, 20including Medicaid managed care organizations, and any entity 21or contracting provider that performs utilization review or 22utilization management functions on an insurer's behalf.23    (t) If the Director determines that an insurer has 24violated this Section, the Director may, after appropriate 25notice and opportunity for hearing, by order, assess a civil 26penalty between $1,000 and $5,000 for each violation. Moneys   HB4709- 51 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1collected from penalties shall be deposited into the Parity 2Advancement Fund established in subsection (i) of Section 3370c.1.4    (u) An insurer shall not adopt, impose, or enforce terms 5in its policies or provider agreements, in writing or in 6operation, that undermine, alter, or conflict with the 7requirements of this Section.8    (v) The provisions of this Section are severable. If any 9provision of this Section or its application is held invalid, 10that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or 11applications that can be given effect without the invalid 12provision or application. 13    (w) Beginning January 1, 2026, coverage for medically 14necessary treatment of mental, emotional, or nervous disorders 15or conditions shall comply with the following requirements:16        (1) No policy shall require prior authorization for 17    outpatient or partial hospitalization services for 18    treatment of mental, emotional, or nervous disorders or 19    conditions provided by a physician licensed to practice 20    medicine in all branches, a licensed clinical 21    psychologist, a licensed clinical social worker, a 22    licensed clinical professional counselor, a licensed 23    marriage and family therapist, a licensed speech-language 24    pathologist, or any other type of licensed, certified, or 25    legally authorized provider, including trainees working 26    under the supervision of a licensed health care   HB4709- 52 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    professional listed under this subsection, or facility 2    whose outpatient or partial hospitalization services the 3    policy covers for treatment of mental, emotional, or 4    nervous disorders or conditions. Such coverage may be 5    subject to concurrent and retrospective review consistent 6    with the utilization review provisions in subsections (h) 7    through (n) and Section 370c.1. Nothing in this paragraph 8    (1) supersedes a health maintenance organization's 9    referral requirement for services from nonparticipating 10    providers. An insurer may require providers or facilities 11    to notify the insurer of the initiation of treatment as 12    specified in this subsection, except to the extent 13    prohibited by Section 370c.1 with respect to treatment 14    limitations in a benefit classification or 15    subclassification. No such coverage shall be subject to 16    concurrent review for any services furnished before an 17    applicable notification deadline, subject to the 18    following:19            (A) In the case of outpatient treatment, for an 20        insurer that is not a Medicaid managed care 21        organization, the insurer may set a notification 22        deadline of 2 business days after the initiation of 23        the covered person's treatment. A Medicaid managed 24        care organization may set a deadline of 24 hours after 25        the initiation of treatment. If the Medicaid managed 26        care organization is not capable of accepting the   HB4709- 53 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1        notification in accordance with the contractual 2        protocol within the 24-hour period following 3        initiation, the treatment provider or facility shall 4        have one additional business day to provide the 5        notification to the Medicaid managed care 6        organization.7            (B) In the case of a partial hospitalization 8        program, for an insurer that is not a Medicaid managed 9        care organization, the insurer may set a notification 10        deadline of 48 hours after the initiation of the 11        covered person's treatment. A Medicaid managed care 12        organization may set a deadline of 24 hours after the 13        initiation of treatment. If the Medicaid managed care 14        organization is not capable of accepting the 15        notification in accordance with the contractual 16        protocol during the 24-hour period following 17        initiation, the treatment provider or facility shall 18        have one additional business day to provide the 19        notification to the Medicaid managed care 20        organization. 21        (2) No policy shall require prior authorization for 22    inpatient treatment at a hospital for mental, emotional, 23    or nervous disorders or conditions at a participating 24    provider. Additionally, no such coverage shall be subject 25    to concurrent review for the first 72 hours after 26    admission, provided that the provider must notify the   HB4709- 54 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    insurer of both the admission and the initial treatment 2    plan within 48 hours of admission. A discharge plan must 3    be fully developed and continuity services prepared to 4    meet the patient's needs and the patient's community 5    preference upon release. Recommended level of care 6    placements identified in the discharge plan shall comply 7    with generally accepted standards of care, as defined in 8    subsection (h).9            (A) If the provider satisfies the conditions of 10        paragraph (2), then the insurer shall approve coverage 11        of the recommended level of care, if applicable, upon 12        discharge subject to concurrent review.13            (B) Nothing in this paragraph supersedes a health 14        maintenance organization's referral requirement for 15        services from nonparticipating providers upon a 16        patient's discharge from a hospital or facility.17            (C) Concurrent review for such coverage must be 18        consistent with the utilization review provisions in 19        subsections (h) through (n).20            (D) In this subsection, residential treatment that 21        is not otherwise identified in the discharge plan is 22        not inpatient hospitalization.23        (3) Treatment provided under this subsection may be 24    reviewed retrospectively. If coverage is denied 25    retrospectively, neither the insurer nor the participating 26    provider shall bill, and the insured shall not be liable,   HB4709- 55 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    for any treatment under this subsection through the date 2    the adverse determination is issued, other than any 3    copayment, coinsurance, or deductible for the stay through 4    that date as applicable under the policy. Coverage shall 5    not be retrospectively denied for the first 72 hours of 6    admission to inpatient hospitalization for treatment of 7    mental, emotional, or nervous disorders or conditions, or 8    before the applicable deadline under paragraph (1) of this 9    subsection for outpatient treatment or partial 10    hospitalization programs, at a participating provider 11    except:12            (A) upon reasonable determination that the 13        inpatient mental health treatment was not provided;14            (B) upon determination that the patient receiving 15        the treatment was not an insured, enrollee, or 16        beneficiary under the policy; 17            (C) upon material misrepresentation by the patient 18        or health care provider. In this item (C), "material" 19        means a fact or situation that is not merely technical 20        in nature and results or could result in a substantial 21        change in the situation;22            (D) upon determination that a service was excluded 23        under the terms of coverage. In that case, the 24        limitation to billing for a copayment, coinsurance, or 25        deductible shall not apply;26            (E) for outpatient treatment or partial   HB4709- 56 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1        hospitalization programs only, upon determination that 2        a service was not medically necessary consistent with 3        subsections (h) through (n); or4             (F) upon determination that the patient did not 5        consent to the treatment and that there was no court 6        order mandating the treatment. 7        Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 8    require a policy to cover any health care service excluded 9    under the terms of coverage. 10        This subsection does not apply to coverage for any 11    prescription or over-the-counter drug.12        Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 13    require the medical assistance program to reimburse for 14    services not covered by the medical assistance program as 15    authorized by the Illinois Public Aid Code or the 16    Children's Health Insurance Program Act. 17    (x) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section, nothing 18shall require the medical assistance program under Article V 19of the Illinois Public Aid Code or the Children's Health 20Insurance Program Act to violate any applicable federal laws, 21regulations, or grant requirements, including requirements for 22utilization management, or any State or federal consent 23decrees. Nothing in subsection (g) or (w) shall prevent the 24Department of Healthcare and Family Services from requiring a 25health care provider to use specified level of care, 26admission, continued stay, or discharge criteria, including,   HB4709- 57 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1but not limited to, those under Section 5-5.23 of the Illinois 2Public Aid Code, as long as the Department of Healthcare and 3Family Services, subject to applicable federal laws, 4regulations, or grant requirements, including requirements for 5utilization management, does not require a health care 6provider to seek prior authorization or concurrent review from 7the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, a Medicaid 8managed care organization, or a utilization review 9organization under the circumstances expressly prohibited by 10subsections (g) and (w). Nothing in this Section prohibits a 11health plan, including a Medicaid managed care organization, 12from conducting reviews for medical necessity, clinical 13appropriateness, safety, fraud, waste, or abuse and reporting 14suspected fraud, waste, or abuse according to State and 15federal requirements. Nothing in this Section limits the 16authority of the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 17or another State agency, or a Medicaid managed care 18organization on the State agency's behalf, to (i) implement or 19require programs, services, screenings, assessments, tools, or 20reviews to comply with applicable federal law, federal 21regulation, federal grant requirements, any State or federal 22consent decrees or court orders, or any applicable case law, 23such as Olmstead v. L.C., 527 U.S. 581 (1999), or (ii) 24administer or require programs, services, screenings, 25assessments, tools, or reviews established under State or 26federal laws, rules, or regulations in compliance with State   HB4709- 58 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1or federal laws, rules, or regulations, including, but not 2limited to, the Children's Mental Health Act and the Mental 3Health and Developmental Disabilities Administrative Act. 4    (y) (Blank). 5(Source: P.A. 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-650, eff. 1-1-25; 6103-1040, eff. 8-9-24; 104-28, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 78-15-25.) 8    Section 905. The Network Adequacy and Transparency Act is 9amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 10    (215 ILCS 124/10)11    Sec. 10. Network adequacy.12    (a) Before issuing, delivering, or renewing a network 13plan, an issuer providing a network plan shall file a 14description of all of the following with the Director:15        (1) The written policies and procedures for adding 16    providers to meet patient needs based on increases in the 17    number of beneficiaries, changes in the 18    patient-to-provider ratio, changes in medical and health 19    care capabilities, and increased demand for services.20        (2) The written policies and procedures for making 21    referrals within and outside the network.22        (3) The written policies and procedures on how the 23    network plan will provide 24-hour, 7-day per week access 24    to network-affiliated primary care, emergency services,   HB4709- 59 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    and obstetrical and gynecological health care 2    professionals.3    An issuer shall not prohibit a preferred provider from 4discussing any specific or all treatment options with 5beneficiaries irrespective of the issuer's position on those 6treatment options or from advocating on behalf of 7beneficiaries within the utilization review, grievance, or 8appeals processes established by the issuer in accordance with 9any rights or remedies available under applicable State or 10federal law.11    (b) Before issuing, delivering, or renewing a network 12plan, an issuer must file for review a description of the 13services to be offered through a network plan. The description 14shall include all of the following:15        (1) A geographic map of the area proposed to be served 16    by the plan by county service area and zip code, including 17    marked locations for preferred providers.18        (2) As deemed necessary by the Department, the names, 19    addresses, phone numbers, and specialties of the providers 20    who have entered into preferred provider agreements under 21    the network plan.22        (3) The number of beneficiaries anticipated to be 23    covered by the network plan.24        (4) An Internet website and toll-free telephone number 25    for beneficiaries and prospective beneficiaries to access 26    current and accurate lists of preferred providers in each   HB4709- 60 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    plan, additional information about the plan, as well as 2    any other information required by Department rule.3        (5) A description of how health care services to be 4    rendered under the network plan are reasonably accessible 5    and available to beneficiaries. The description shall 6    address all of the following:7            (A) the type of health care services to be 8        provided by the network plan;9            (B) the ratio of physicians and other providers to 10        beneficiaries, by specialty and including primary care 11        physicians and facility-based physicians when 12        applicable under the contract, necessary to meet the 13        health care needs and service demands of the currently 14        enrolled population; 15            (C) the travel and distance standards for plan 16        beneficiaries in county service areas; and17            (D) a description of how the use of telemedicine, 18        telehealth, or mobile care services may be used to 19        partially meet the network adequacy standards, if 20        applicable.21        (6) A provision ensuring that whenever a beneficiary 22    has made a good faith effort, as evidenced by accessing 23    the provider directory, calling the network plan, and 24    calling the provider, to utilize preferred providers for a 25    covered service and it is determined the issuer does not 26    have the appropriate preferred providers due to   HB4709- 61 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    insufficient number, type, unreasonable travel distance or 2    delay, or preferred providers refusing to provide a 3    covered service because it is contrary to the conscience 4    of the preferred providers, as protected by the Health 5    Care Right of Conscience Act, the issuer shall give the 6    beneficiary a network exception and shall ensure, directly 7    or indirectly, by terms contained in the payer contract, 8    that the beneficiary will be provided the covered service 9    at no greater cost to the beneficiary than if the service 10    had been provided by a preferred provider. This paragraph 11    (6) does not apply to: (A) a beneficiary who willfully 12    chooses to access a non-preferred provider for health care 13    services available through the panel of preferred 14    providers, or (B) a beneficiary enrolled in a health 15    maintenance organization, except that the health 16    maintenance organization must notify the beneficiary when 17    a referral has been granted as a network exception based 18    on any preferred provider access deficiency described in 19    this paragraph or under the circumstances applicable in 20    paragraph (3) of subsection (d-5). In these circumstances, 21    the contractual requirements for non-preferred provider 22    reimbursements shall apply unless Section 356z.3a of the 23    Illinois Insurance Code requires otherwise. In no event 24    shall a beneficiary who receives care at a participating 25    health care facility be required to search for 26    participating providers under the circumstances described   HB4709- 62 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    in subsection (b) or (b-5) of Section 356z.3a of the 2    Illinois Insurance Code except under the circumstances 3    described in paragraph (2) of subsection (b-5).4        (7) A provision that the beneficiary shall receive 5    emergency care coverage such that payment for this 6    coverage is not dependent upon whether the emergency 7    services are performed by a preferred or non-preferred 8    provider and the coverage shall be at the same benefit 9    level as if the service or treatment had been rendered by a 10    preferred provider. For purposes of this paragraph (7), 11    "the same benefit level" means that the beneficiary is 12    provided the covered service at no greater cost to the 13    beneficiary than if the service had been provided by a 14    preferred provider. This provision shall be consistent 15    with Section 356z.3a of the Illinois Insurance Code.16        (8) A limitation that complies with the following 17    prior authorization requirements: subsections (d) and (e) 18    of Section 55 of the Prior Authorization Reform Act.19            (A) If a health insurance issuer imposes a 20        monetary penalty on the enrollee for the enrollee's, 21        health care professional's, or health care provider's 22        failure to obtain any form of prior authorization for 23        a health care service, the penalty may not exceed the 24        lesser of: 25                (i) the actual cost of the health care 26            service; or   HB4709- 63 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1                (ii) $1,000 per occurrence in addition to the 2            plan cost-sharing provisions. 3            (B) A health insurance issuer may not require both 4        the enrollee and the health care professional or 5        health care provider to obtain any form of prior 6        authorization for the same instance of a health care 7        service, nor otherwise require more than one prior 8        authorization for the same instance of a health care 9        service.10        (9) For a network plan to be offered through the 11    Exchange in the individual or small group market, as well 12    as any off-Exchange mirror of such a network plan, 13    evidence that the network plan includes essential 14    community providers in accordance with rules established 15    by the Exchange that will operate in this State for the 16    applicable plan year. 17    (c) The issuer shall demonstrate to the Director a minimum 18ratio of providers to plan beneficiaries as required by the 19Department for each network plan.20        (1) The minimum ratio of physicians or other providers 21    to plan beneficiaries shall be established by the 22    Department in consultation with the Department of Public 23    Health based upon the guidance from the federal Centers 24    for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The Department shall 25    not establish ratios for vision or dental providers who 26    provide services under dental-specific or vision-specific   HB4709- 64 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    benefits, except to the extent provided under federal law 2    for stand-alone dental plans. The Department shall 3    consider establishing ratios for the following physicians 4    or other providers:5            (A) Primary Care;6            (B) Pediatrics;7            (C) Cardiology;8            (D) Gastroenterology;9            (E) General Surgery;10            (F) Neurology;11            (G) OB/GYN;12            (H) Oncology/Radiation;13            (I) Ophthalmology;14            (J) Urology;15            (K) Behavioral Health;16            (L) Allergy/Immunology;17            (M) Chiropractic;18            (N) Dermatology;19            (O) Endocrinology;20            (P) Ears, Nose, and Throat (ENT)/Otolaryngology;21            (Q) Infectious Disease;22            (R) Nephrology;23            (S) Neurosurgery;24            (T) Orthopedic Surgery;25            (U) Physiatry/Rehabilitative;26            (V) Plastic Surgery;  HB4709- 65 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1            (W) Pulmonary;2            (X) Rheumatology;3            (Y) Anesthesiology;4            (Z) Pain Medicine;5            (AA) Pediatric Specialty Services;6            (BB) Outpatient Dialysis;7            (CC) HIV; and8            (DD) Genetic Medicine and Genetic Counseling. 9        (1.5) Beginning January 1, 2026, every issuer shall 10    demonstrate to the Director that each in-network hospital 11    has at least one radiologist, pathologist, 12    anesthesiologist, and emergency room physician as a 13    preferred provider in a network plan. The Department may, 14    by rule, require additional types of hospital-based 15    medical specialists to be included as preferred providers 16    in each in-network hospital in a network plan. 17        (2) The Director shall establish a process for the 18    review of the adequacy of these standards, along with an 19    assessment of additional specialties to be included in the 20    list under this subsection (c).21        (3) Notwithstanding any other law or rule, the minimum 22    ratio for each provider type shall be no less than any such 23    ratio established for qualified health plans in 24    Federally-Facilitated Exchanges by federal law or by the 25    federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, even 26    if the network plan is issued in the large group market or   HB4709- 66 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    is otherwise not issued through an exchange. Federal 2    standards for stand-alone dental plans shall only apply to 3    such network plans. In the absence of an applicable 4    Department rule, the federal standards shall apply for the 5    time period specified in the federal law, regulation, or 6    guidance. If the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 7    Services establish standards that are more stringent than 8    the standards in effect under any Department rule, the 9    Department may amend its rules to conform to the more 10    stringent federal standards. 11        (4) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 12    Services establishes minimum provider ratios for 13    stand-alone dental plans in the type of exchange in use in 14    this State for a given plan year, the Department shall 15    enforce those standards for stand-alone dental plans for 16    that plan year. 17    (d) The network plan shall demonstrate to the Director 18maximum travel and distance standards and appointment 19wait-time standards for plan beneficiaries, which shall be 20established by the Department in consultation with the 21Department of Public Health based upon the guidance from the 22federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. These 23standards shall consist of the maximum minutes or miles to be 24traveled by a plan beneficiary for each county type, such as 25large counties, metro counties, or rural counties as defined 26by Department rule.  HB4709- 67 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    The maximum travel time and distance standards must 2include standards for each physician and other provider 3category listed for which ratios have been established.4    The Director shall establish a process for the review of 5the adequacy of these standards along with an assessment of 6additional specialties to be included in the list under this 7subsection (d).8    Notwithstanding any other law or Department rule, the 9maximum travel time and distance standards and appointment 10wait-time standards shall be no greater than any such 11standards established for qualified health plans in 12Federally-Facilitated Exchanges by federal law or by the 13federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, even if 14the network plan is issued in the large group market or is 15otherwise not issued through an exchange. Federal standards 16for stand-alone dental plans shall only apply to such network 17plans. In the absence of an applicable Department rule, the 18federal standards shall apply for the time period specified in 19the federal law, regulation, or guidance. If the Centers for 20Medicare and Medicaid Services establish standards that are 21more stringent than the standards in effect under any 22Department rule, the Department may amend its rules to conform 23to the more stringent federal standards. 24    If the federal area designations for the maximum time or 25distance or appointment wait-time standards required are 26changed by the most recent Letter to Issuers in the   HB4709- 68 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1Federally-facilitated Marketplaces, the Department shall post 2on its website notice of such changes and may amend its rules 3to conform to those designations if the Director deems 4appropriate. 5    If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services 6establishes appointment wait-time standards for qualified 7health plans, including stand-alone dental plans, in the type 8of exchange in use in this State for a given plan year, the 9Department shall enforce those standards for the same types of 10qualified health plans for that plan year. If the federal 11Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services establishes time 12and distance standards for stand-alone dental plans in the 13type of exchange in use in this State for a given plan year, 14the Department shall enforce those standards for stand-alone 15dental plans for that plan year. 16    (d-5)(1) Every issuer shall ensure that beneficiaries have 17timely and proximate access to treatment for mental, 18emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions 19in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (4) of 20subsection (a) of Section 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. 21Issuers shall use a comparable process, strategy, evidentiary 22standard, and other factors in the development and application 23of the network adequacy standards for timely and proximate 24access to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or 25substance use disorders or conditions and those for the access 26to treatment for medical and surgical conditions. As such, the   HB4709- 69 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access 2shall equally be applied to treatment facilities and providers 3for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 4conditions and specialists providing medical or surgical 5benefits pursuant to the parity requirements of Section 370c.1 6of the Illinois Insurance Code and the federal Paul Wellstone 7and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity 8Act of 2008. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the network 9adequacy standards for timely and proximate access to 10treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 11disorders or conditions shall, at a minimum, satisfy the 12following requirements:13        (A) For beneficiaries residing in the metropolitan 14    counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, and Will, 15    network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access 16    to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance 17    use disorders or conditions means a beneficiary shall not 18    have to travel longer than 30 minutes or 30 miles from the 19    beneficiary's residence to receive outpatient treatment 20    for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders 21    or conditions. Beneficiaries shall not be required to wait 22    longer than 10 business days between requesting an initial 23    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of 24    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 25    conditions for outpatient treatment or to wait longer than 26    20 business days between requesting a repeat or follow-up   HB4709- 70 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of 2    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 3    conditions for outpatient treatment; however, subject to 4    the protections of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a 5    network plan shall not be held responsible if the 6    beneficiary or provider voluntarily chooses to schedule an 7    appointment outside of these required time frames.8        (B) For beneficiaries residing in Illinois counties 9    other than those counties listed in subparagraph (A) of 10    this paragraph, network adequacy standards for timely and 11    proximate access to treatment for mental, emotional, 12    nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions means a 13    beneficiary shall not have to travel longer than 60 14    minutes or 60 miles from the beneficiary's residence to 15    receive outpatient treatment for mental, emotional, 16    nervous, or substance use disorders or conditions. 17    Beneficiaries shall not be required to wait longer than 10 18    business days between requesting an initial appointment 19    and being seen by the facility or provider of mental, 20    emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 21    conditions for outpatient treatment or to wait longer than 22    20 business days between requesting a repeat or follow-up 23    appointment and being seen by the facility or provider of 24    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorders or 25    conditions for outpatient treatment; however, subject to 26    the protections of paragraph (3) of this subsection, a   HB4709- 71 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    network plan shall not be held responsible if the 2    beneficiary or provider voluntarily chooses to schedule an 3    appointment outside of these required time frames.4    (2) For beneficiaries residing in all Illinois counties, 5network adequacy standards for timely and proximate access to 6treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 7disorders or conditions means a beneficiary shall not have to 8travel longer than 60 minutes or 60 miles from the 9beneficiary's residence to receive inpatient or residential 10treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 11disorders or conditions.12    (3) If there is no in-network facility or provider 13available for a beneficiary to receive timely and proximate 14access to treatment for mental, emotional, nervous, or 15substance use disorders or conditions in accordance with the 16network adequacy standards outlined in this subsection, the 17issuer shall provide necessary exceptions to its network to 18ensure admission and treatment with a provider or at a 19treatment facility in accordance with the network adequacy 20standards in this subsection at the in-network benefit level. 21        (A) For plan or policy years beginning on or after 22    January 1, 2026, the issuer also shall provide reasonable 23    reimbursement to a beneficiary who has received an 24    exception as outlined in this paragraph (3) for costs 25    including food, lodging, and travel.26            (i) Reimbursement for food and lodging shall be at   HB4709- 72 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1        the prevailing federal per diem rates then in effect, 2        as set by the United States General Services 3        Administration. Reimbursement for travel by vehicle 4        shall be reimbursed at the current Internal Revenue 5        Service mileage standard for miles driven for 6        transportation or travel expenses.7            (ii) At the time an issuer grants an exception 8        under this paragraph (3), the issuer shall give 9        written notification to the beneficiary of potential 10        eligibility for reimbursement under this subparagraph 11        (A) and instructions on how to file a claim for such 12        reimbursement, including a link to the claim form on 13        the issuer's public website and a phone number for a 14        beneficiary to request that the issuer send a hard 15        copy of the claim form by postal mail. The Department 16        shall create the template for the reimbursement 17        notification form, which issuers shall fill in and 18        post on their public website.19            (iii) An issuer may require a beneficiary to 20        submit a claim for food, travel, or lodging 21        reimbursement within 60 days of the last date of the 22        health care service for which travel was undertaken, 23        and the beneficiary may appeal any denial of 24        reimbursement claims.25            (iv) An issuer may deny reimbursement for food, 26        lodging, and travel if the provider's site of care is   HB4709- 73 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1        neither within this State nor within 100 miles of the 2        beneficiary's residence unless, after a good faith 3        effort, no provider can be found who is available 4        within those parameters to provide the medically 5        necessary health care service within 10 business days 6        of a request for appointment.7        (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 8    Section to the contrary, subparagraph (A) of this 9    paragraph (3) does not apply to policies issued or 10    delivered in this State that provide medical assistance 11    under the Illinois Public Aid Code or the Children's 12    Health Insurance Program Act.13    (4) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 14Services establishes or law requires more stringent standards 15for qualified health plans in the Federally-Facilitated 16Exchanges, the federal standards shall control for all network 17plans for the time period specified in the federal law, 18regulation, or guidance, even if the network plan is issued in 19the large group market, is issued through a different type of 20Exchange, or is otherwise not issued through an Exchange. 21    (5) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 22Services establishes a more stringent standard in any county 23than specified in paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection 24(d-5) for qualified health plans in the type of exchange in use 25in this State for a given plan year, the federal standard shall 26apply in lieu of the standard in paragraph (1) or (2) of this   HB4709- 74 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1subsection (d-5) for qualified health plans for that plan 2year. 3    (e) Except for network plans solely offered as a group 4health plan, these ratio and time and distance standards apply 5to the lowest cost-sharing tier of any tiered network.6    (f) The network plan may consider use of other health care 7service delivery options, such as telemedicine or telehealth, 8mobile clinics, and centers of excellence, or other ways of 9delivering care to partially meet the requirements set under 10this Section.11    (g) Except for the requirements set forth in subsection 12(d-5), issuers who are not able to comply with the provider 13ratios, time and distance standards, and appointment wait-time 14standards established under this Act or federal law may 15request an exception to these requirements from the 16Department. The Department may grant an exception in the 17following circumstances:18        (1) if no providers or facilities meet the specific 19    time and distance standard in a specific service area and 20    the issuer (i) discloses information on the distance and 21    travel time points that beneficiaries would have to travel 22    beyond the required criterion to reach the next closest 23    contracted provider outside of the service area and (ii) 24    provides contact information, including names, addresses, 25    and phone numbers for the next closest contracted provider 26    or facility;  HB4709- 75 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1        (2) if patterns of care in the service area do not 2    support the need for the requested number of provider or 3    facility type and the issuer provides data on local 4    patterns of care, such as claims data, referral patterns, 5    or local provider interviews, indicating where the 6    beneficiaries currently seek this type of care or where 7    the physicians currently refer beneficiaries, or both; or8        (3) other circumstances deemed appropriate by the 9    Department consistent with the requirements of this Act.10    (h) Issuers are required to report to the Director any 11material change to an approved network plan within 15 business 12days after the change occurs and any change that would result 13in failure to meet the requirements of this Act. The issuer 14shall submit a revised version of the portions of the network 15adequacy filing affected by the material change, as determined 16by the Director by rule, and the issuer shall attach versions 17with the changes indicated for each document that was revised 18from the previous version of the filing. Upon notice from the 19issuer, the Director shall reevaluate the network plan's 20compliance with the network adequacy and transparency 21standards of this Act. For every day past 15 business days that 22the issuer fails to submit a revised network adequacy filing 23to the Director, the Director may order a fine of $5,000 per 24day. 25    (i) If a network plan is inadequate under this Act with 26respect to a provider type in a county, and if the network plan   HB4709- 76 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1does not have an approved exception for that provider type in 2that county pursuant to subsection (g), an issuer shall cover 3out-of-network claims for covered health care services 4received from that provider type within that county at the 5in-network benefit level and shall retroactively adjudicate 6and reimburse beneficiaries to achieve that objective if their 7claims were processed at the out-of-network level contrary to 8this subsection. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed 9to supersede Section 356z.3a of the Illinois Insurance Code. 10    (j) If the Director determines that a network is 11inadequate in any county and no exception has been granted 12under subsection (g) and the issuer does not have a process in 13place to comply with subsection (d-5), the Director may 14prohibit the network plan from being issued or renewed within 15that county until the Director determines that the network is 16adequate apart from processes and exceptions described in 17subsections (d-5) and (g). Nothing in this subsection shall be 18construed to terminate any beneficiary's health insurance 19coverage under a network plan before the expiration of the 20beneficiary's policy period if the Director makes a 21determination under this subsection after the issuance or 22renewal of the beneficiary's policy or certificate because of 23a material change. Policies or certificates issued or renewed 24in violation of this subsection may subject the issuer to a 25civil penalty of $5,000 per policy. 26    (k) For the Department to enforce any new or modified   HB4709- 77 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1federal standard before the Department adopts the standard by 2rule, the Department must, no later than May 15 before the 3start of the plan year, give public notice to the affected 4health insurance issuers through a bulletin. 5(Source: P.A. 103-650, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 6103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-777, eff. 1-1-25; 103-906, eff. 71-1-25; 104-28, eff. 1-1-26; 104-175, eff. 1-1-26; 104-334, 8eff. 8-15-25; revised 10-28-25.) 9    Section 910. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 10changing Section 5-5.12e as follows: 11    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.12e)12    Sec. 5-5.12e. Managed care organization prior 13authorization of health care services.14    (a) As used in this Section, "health care service" has the 15meaning given to that term in the Standardized Prior 16Authorization Act Prior Authorization Reform Act.17    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 18contrary, all managed care organizations shall comply with the 19requirements of the Prior Authorization Reform Act.20(Source: P.A. 102-409, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 21    (215 ILCS 200/Act rep.)22    Section 915. The Prior Authorization Reform Act is 23repealed.   HB4709- 78 -LRB104 17431 BAB 30856 b1    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 21, 2027.